Illinois, session 104th, SB3950.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act is 5amended by changing Sections 15, 35, 70, 75, 92, and 135 and by 6adding Section 91 as follows: 7    (210 ILCS 9/15)8    Sec. 15. Assessment and service plan requirements. Prior 9to admission to any establishment covered by this Act, a 10comprehensive assessment that includes an evaluation of the 11prospective resident's physical, cognitive, and psychosocial 12condition shall be completed by a physician or a nurse 13practitioner or physician assistant. At least annually, a 14comprehensive assessment shall be completed, and upon 15identification of a significant change in the resident's 16condition, including, but not limited to, a diagnosis of 17Alzheimer's disease or a related dementia, the resident shall 18be reassessed. The Department may by rule specify 19circumstances under which more frequent assessments of skin 20integrity and nutritional status shall be required. The 21comprehensive assessment shall be completed by a physician or 22a nurse practitioner or physician assistant. Based on the 23assessment, the resident's interests and preferences,   SB3950- 2 -LRB104 18331 BAB 31771 b1dislikes, and any known triggers for behavior that endangers 2the resident or others, a written service plan shall be 3developed and mutually agreed upon by the provider, the 4resident, and the resident's representative, if any. The 5service plan, which shall be reviewed annually, or more often 6as the resident's condition, preferences, or service needs 7change, shall serve as a basis for the service delivery 8contract between the provider and the resident. The resident 9and the resident's representative, if any, shall, upon 10request, be given a copy of the most recent assessment; a 11supplemental assessment, if any, completed by the 12establishment; and a service plan. Based on the assessment, 13the service plan may provide for the disconnection or removal 14of any appliance. 15(Source: P.A. 104-191, eff. 1-1-26.) 16    (210 ILCS 9/35)17    Sec. 35. Issuance of license. 18    (a) Upon receipt and review of an application for a 19license and review of the applicant establishment, the 20Director may issue a license if he or she finds: 21        (1) that the individual applicant, or the corporation, 22    partnership, or other entity if the applicant is not an 23    individual, is a person responsible and suitable to 24    operate or to direct or participate in the operation of an 25    establishment by virtue of financial capacity, appropriate   SB3950- 3 -LRB104 18331 BAB 31771 b1    business or professional experience, a record of lawful 2    compliance with lawful orders of the Department and lack 3    of revocation of a license issued under this Act, the 4    Nursing Home Care Act, the Specialized Mental Health 5    Rehabilitation Act of 2013, the ID/DD Community Care Act, 6    or the MC/DD Act during the previous 5 years; 7        (2) that the establishment is under the supervision of 8    a full-time director who is at least 21 years of age and 9    has a high school diploma or equivalent plus either:10            (A) 2 years of management experience or 2 years of 11        experience in positions of progressive responsibility 12        in health care, housing with services, or adult day 13        care or providing similar services to the elderly; or14            (B) 2 years of management experience or 2 years of 15        experience in positions of progressive responsibility 16        in hospitality and training in health care and housing 17        with services management as defined by rule; or 18            (C) a college degree in health administration or 19        the completion of an approved program within 6 months 20        after hiring; 21        (3) that the establishment has staff sufficient in 22    number with qualifications, adequate skills, education, 23    and experience to meet the 24 hour scheduled and 24    unscheduled needs of residents and who participate in 25    ongoing training to serve the resident population; 26        (4) that all employees who are subject to the Health   SB3950- 4 -LRB104 18331 BAB 31771 b1    Care Worker Background Check Act meet the requirements of 2    that Act; 3        (5) that the applicant is in substantial compliance 4    with this Act and such other requirements for a license as 5    the Department by rule may establish under this Act; 6        (6) that the applicant pays all required fees; 7        (7) that the applicant has provided to the Department 8    an accurate disclosure document in accordance with the 9    Alzheimer's Disease and Related Dementias Special Care 10    Disclosure Act and in substantial compliance with Section 11    150 of this Act.12    In addition to any other requirements set forth in this 13Act, as a condition of licensure under this Act, the director 14of an establishment must participate in at least 20 hours of 15training every 2 years to assist him or her in better meeting 16the needs of the residents of the establishment and managing 17the operation of the establishment. 18    Any license issued by the Director shall state the 19physical location of the establishment, the date the license 20was issued, and the expiration date. All licenses shall be 21valid for one year, except as provided in Sections 40 and 45. 22Each license shall be issued only for the premises and persons 23named in the application, and shall not be transferable or 24assignable.25(Source: P.A. 98-104, eff. 7-22-13; 99-180, eff. 7-29-15.)   SB3950- 5 -LRB104 18331 BAB 31771 b1    (210 ILCS 9/70)2    Sec. 70. Service requirements. An establishment must 3provide all mandatory services and may provide optional 4services, including medication reminders, supervision of 5self-administered medication and medication administration as 6defined by this Section and nonmedical services defined by 7rule, whether provided directly by the establishment or by 8another entity arranged for by the establishment with the 9consent of the resident or the resident's representative.10    For the purposes of this Section, "medication reminders" 11means reminding residents to take pre-dispensed, 12self-administered medication, observing the resident, and 13documenting whether or not the resident took the medication.14    For the purposes of this Section, "supervision of 15self-administered medication" means assisting the resident 16with self-administered medication using any combination of the 17following: reminding residents to take medication, reading the 18medication label to residents, checking the self-administered 19medication dosage against the label of the medication, 20confirming that residents have obtained and are taking the 21dosage as prescribed, and documenting in writing that the 22resident has taken (or refused to take) the medication. If 23residents are physically unable to open the container, the 24container may be opened for them. Supervision of 25self-administered medication shall be under the direction of a 26licensed health care professional or, in the case of a   SB3950- 6 -LRB104 18331 BAB 31771 b1certified medication aide, under the supervision and 2delegation of a registered nurse as authorized by Section 350-75 of the Nurse Practice Act.4    For the purposes of this Section, "medication 5administration" refers to a licensed health care professional 6employed by an establishment engaging in administering insulin 7and vitamin B-12 injections, oral medications, topical 8treatments, eye and ear drops, or nitroglycerin patches, and 9intramuscular injections. A certified medication aide may 10administer medications under the supervision and delegation of 11a registered nurse as authorized by Section 50-75 of the Nurse 12Practice Act, except (i) Schedule II controlled substances as 13set forth in the Illinois Controlled Substances Act and (ii) 14any subcutaneous, intramuscular, intradermal, or intravenous 15medication. 16    The Department shall specify by rule procedures for 17medication reminders, supervision of self-administered 18medication, and medication administration.19    Nothing in this Act shall preclude a physician licensed 20under the Medical Practice Act of 1987 from providing services 21within the scope of his or her license to any resident.22(Source: P.A. 103-886, eff. 8-9-24.) 23    (210 ILCS 9/75)24    Sec. 75. Residency requirements. 25    (a) No individual shall be accepted for residency or   SB3950- 7 -LRB104 18331 BAB 31771 b1remain in residence if the establishment cannot provide or 2secure appropriate services, if the individual requires a 3level of service or type of service for which the 4establishment is not licensed or which the establishment does 5not provide, or if the establishment does not have the staff 6appropriate in numbers and with appropriate skill to provide 7such services.8    (b) Only adults may be accepted for residency.9    (c) A person shall not be accepted for residency if:10        (1) the person poses a serious threat to himself or 11    herself or to others;12        (2) the person is not able to communicate his or her 13    needs and no resident representative residing in the 14    establishment, and with a prior relationship to the 15    person, has been appointed to direct the provision of 16    services;17        (3) the person requires total assistance with 2 or 18    more activities of daily living;19        (4) the person requires the assistance of more than 20    one paid caregiver at any given time with an activity of 21    daily living;22        (5) the person requires more than minimal assistance 23    in moving to a safe area in an emergency;24        (6) the person has a severe mental illness, which for 25    the purposes of this Section means a condition that is 26    characterized by the presence of a major mental disorder   SB3950- 8 -LRB104 18331 BAB 31771 b1    as classified in the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of 2    Mental Disorders, Fourth Edition (DSM-IV) (American 3    Psychiatric Association, 1994), where the individual is a 4    person with a substantial disability due to mental illness 5    in the areas of self-maintenance, social functioning, 6    activities of community living and work skills, and the 7    disability specified is expected to be present for a 8    period of not less than one year, but does not mean 9    Alzheimer's disease and other forms of dementia based on 10    organic or physical disorders;11        (7) the person requires intravenous therapy or 12    intravenous feedings unless self-administered or 13    administered by a qualified, licensed health care 14    professional;15        (8) the person requires gastrostomy feedings unless 16    self-administered or administered by a licensed health 17    care professional;18        (9) the person requires insertion, sterile irrigation, 19    and replacement of catheter, except for routine 20    maintenance of urinary catheters, unless the catheter care 21    is self-administered or administered by a licensed health 22    care professional or a nurse in compliance with education, 23    certification, and training in catheter care or infection 24    control by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention 25    with oversight from an infection preventionist or 26    infection control committee;  SB3950- 9 -LRB104 18331 BAB 31771 b1        (10) the person requires sterile wound care unless 2    care is self-administered or administered by a licensed 3    health care professional;4        (11) (blank);5        (12) the person is a diabetic requiring routine 6    insulin injections unless the injections are 7    self-administered or administered by a licensed health 8    care professional;9        (13) the person requires treatment of stage 3 or stage 10    4 decubitus ulcers or exfoliative dermatitis;11        (14) the person requires 5 or more skilled nursing 12    visits per week for conditions other than those listed in 13    items (13) and (15) of this subsection for a period of 3 14    consecutive weeks or more except when the course of 15    treatment is expected to extend beyond a 3-week period for 16    rehabilitative purposes and is certified as temporary by a 17    physician; or18        (15) other reasons prescribed by the Department by 19    rule.20    (d) A resident with a condition listed in items (1) 21through (15) of subsection (c) shall have his or her residency 22terminated.23    (e) Residency shall be terminated when services available 24to the resident in the establishment are no longer adequate to 25meet the needs of the resident. The establishment shall notify 26the resident and the resident's representative, if any, when   SB3950- 10 -LRB104 18331 BAB 31771 b1there is a significant change in the resident's condition that 2affects the establishment's ability to meet the resident's 3needs. The requirements of subsection (c) of Section 80 shall 4then apply. This provision shall not be interpreted as 5limiting the authority of the Department to require the 6residency termination of individuals.7    (f) Subsection (d) of this Section shall not apply to 8terminally ill residents who receive or would qualify for 9hospice care and such care is coordinated by a hospice program 10licensed under the Hospice Program Licensing Act or other 11licensed health care professional employed by a licensed home 12health agency and the establishment and all parties agree to 13the continued residency.14    (g) Items (3), (4), (5), and (9) of subsection (c) shall 15not apply to a quadriplegic, paraplegic, or individual with 16neuro-muscular diseases, such as muscular dystrophy and 17multiple sclerosis, or other chronic diseases and conditions 18as defined by rule if the individual is able to communicate his 19or her needs and does not require assistance with complex 20medical problems, and the establishment is able to accommodate 21the individual's needs. The Department shall prescribe rules 22pursuant to this Section that address special safety and 23service needs of these individuals.24    (h) For the purposes of items (7) through (10) of 25subsection (c), a licensed health care professional may not be 26employed by the owner or operator of the establishment, its   SB3950- 11 -LRB104 18331 BAB 31771 b1parent entity, or any other entity with ownership common to 2either the owner or operator of the establishment or parent 3entity, including, but not limited to, an affiliate of the 4owner or operator of the establishment, if the resident 5chooses to utilize the services of the licensed health care 6professional working within the scope of the professional's 7practice. Nothing in this Section is meant to limit a 8resident's right to choose his or her health care provider.9    (i) Subsection (h) is not applicable to residents admitted 10to an assisted living establishment under a life care contract 11as defined in the Life Care Facilities Act if the life care 12facility has both an assisted living establishment and a 13skilled nursing facility. A licensed health care professional 14providing health-related or supportive services at a life care 15assisted living or shared housing establishment must be 16employed by an entity licensed by the Department under the 17Nursing Home Care Act or the Home Health, Home Services, and 18Home Nursing Agency Licensing Act. 19(Source: P.A. 103-444, eff. 1-1-24; 103-844, eff. 7-1-25; 20104-191, eff. 1-1-26.) 21    (210 ILCS 9/91 new)22    Sec. 91. Emergency plan; disaster preparedness drills.23    (a) Each establishment shall have a written plan for 24protection of all persons in the event of disasters, for 25keeping persons in place, evacuating persons to areas of   SB3950- 12 -LRB104 18331 BAB 31771 b1refuge, and evacuating persons from the building when 2necessary. The plan shall address the physical and cognitive 3needs of residents and include special staff response, 4including the procedures needed to ensure the safety of any 5resident. The plan shall be amended or revised whenever any 6resident with unusual needs is admitted. The plan shall also:7        (1) provide for the temporary relocation of residents 8    for any disaster requiring relocation;9        (2) provide for the movement of residents to safe 10    locations within the establishment in the event of a 11    tornado warning or severe thunderstorm warning issued by 12    the National Weather Service;13        (3) provide for the temporary relocation of residents 14    any time the temperature in residents' bedrooms falls 15    below 55 degrees Fahrenheit for 12 hours or more as a 16    result of a mechanical problem or loss of power in the 17    establishment;18        (4) provide for the health, safety, welfare, and 19    comfort of all residents when the heat index or apparent 20    temperature, as established by the National Oceanic and 21    Atmospheric Administration, inside the residents' living, 22    dining, activities, or sleeping areas of the establishment 23    exceeds a heat index or apparent temperature of 80 degrees 24    Fahrenheit;25        (5) address power outages; and26        (6) include contingencies in the event of flooding, if   SB3950- 13 -LRB104 18331 BAB 31771 b1    located on a flood plain.2    (b) Each establishment shall conduct at least 6 drills per 3year on a bimonthly basis. At least 2 of the drills, involving 4staff only, shall be conducted during the night when residents 5are sleeping. All drills shall be held under varied conditions 6to:7        (1) ensure that all personnel on all shifts are 8    trained to perform assigned tasks;9        (2) ensure that all personnel on all shifts are 10    familiar with the use of the firefighting equipment in the 11    facility; and12        (3) evaluate the effectiveness of disaster plans, 13    procedures, and training.14    Drills shall include residents, except at night when 15residents are sleeping, establishment personnel, and other 16persons in the establishment. Drills shall involve the actual 17evacuation of residents to an assembly point specified in the 18emergency plan, unless the community has a shelter-in-place 19protocol approved by the local fire department and shall 20provide residents with experience using various means of 21escape. If an establishment has an evacuation capability 22classification of impractical, those residents who cannot 23meaningfully assist in their own evacuation or who have 24special health problems shall not be required to participate 25in the drill. If weather or other conditions present risk to 26residents for actual evacuation of the entire building, the   SB3950- 14 -LRB104 18331 BAB 31771 b1establishment shall conduct drills that involve evacuating to 2designated sections or portions of the building. These drills 3must simulate real evacuation conditions and ensure that, with 4the personnel typically available, the entire building could 5be evacuated if necessary.6    As used in this subsection, "an evacuation capability of 7impractical" means a situation where an establishment has a 8high number of occupants with severe mobility limitations so 9that a full evacuation within a reasonable time frame is 10deemed nearly impossible. 11    Memory care units shall be deemed as impractical for 12conducting drills, and residents shall be exempt. This 13exemption does not apply to staff working in the memory care 14unit. 15    (210 ILCS 9/92)16    Sec. 92. Incident and accident reporting. 17    (a) Within 24 hours after the incident or by the end of the 18next business day, an An establishment must report to the 19Department any incident or accident that results in 20significant physical harm or injury to a resident or any 21situation where a resident requires outside emergent medical 22treatment as a direct result of an incident or accident. A 23change in a resident's condition that is due to health or 24medical decline is not a reportable incident or accident.25    (b) As used in this subsection, "nonemergency lift" means   SB3950- 15 -LRB104 18331 BAB 31771 b1lifting a resident from the resident's current position to a 2desired position. "Nonemergency lift" does not include an 3incident or accident that results in significant physical harm 4or injury to a resident or any situation where a resident 5requires outside emergent medical treatment as a direct result 6of an incident or accident. Staff in an establishment may be 7trained to assist in a nonemergency lift of a resident. 8(Source: P.A. 104-209, eff. 1-1-26.) 9    (210 ILCS 9/135)10    Sec. 135. Civil penalties. 11    (a) The Department may assess a civil penalty not to 12exceed $5,000 against any establishment subject to this Act 13for violations of this Act. Each day a violation continues 14shall be deemed a separate violation.15    (b) Beginning 180 days after the adoption of rules under 16this Act, the Department may assess a civil penalty not to 17exceed $3,000 against any establishment subject to this Act 18for caring for a resident who exceeds the care needs defined in 19this Act. Each day a violation continues shall be deemed a 20separate violation.21    (c) The Department is authorized to hold hearings in 22contested cases regarding appeals of the penalties assessed 23pursuant to this Section.24    (d) Repeated technical infractions within a calendar year 25may result in a Type 3 violation.   SB3950- 16 -LRB104 18331 BAB 31771 b1(Source: P.A. 91-656, eff. 1-1-01.)